Illinois, session 104th, HB5455.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Criminal Code of 2012 is amended by adding 5Section 11-18.2 as follows: 6    (720 ILCS 5/11-18.2 new)7    Sec. 11-18.2. Patronizing a person engaged in the sex 8trade; assessment. 9    (a) In addition to any other disposition authorized by 10law, the court shall order any person arrested for patronizing 11a person engaged in the sex trade as provided under Section 1211-18 to participate in the Buyer Accountability Program 13established under subsection (d).14    (b) In addition to any fine, fee, assessment, or penalty 15authorized under Section 11-18, a person charged with 16patronizing a person engaged in the sex trade as provided 17under Section 11-18 shall be assessed, if ordered to 18participate in the Buyer Accountability Program, a fee of 19$1,000.20    (c) Each $1,000 fee assessed as required by this Section 21shall be collected by the court, and deposited into the 22Specialized Services for Survivors of Human Trafficking Fund 23established by Section 5-9-1.21 of the Unified Code of   HB5455- 2 -LRB104 18216 RLC 31655 b1Corrections. From this fee, $600 shall be retained in the 2fund, and the remaining $400 shall be distributed as follows:3        (1) $300 to the approved provider of the Buyer 4    Accountability Program, as established under subsection 5    (d), attended by the person; and6        (2) $100 to the law enforcement agency that arrested 7    the person resulting in that person's arrest.8    (d)(1) There is established an education program to be 9known as the Buyer Accountability Program, which shall consist 10of an instructional program on prostitution and human 11trafficking schemes offered in one or more locations 12throughout the State as follows:13        (A) by a local public entity as defined in Section 14    1-206 of the Local Governmental and Governmental Employees 15    Tort Immunity Act, alone or in partnership with a 16    nonprofit, pertaining to the proposed operation of an 17    instructional program by the local public entity, or 18    alternatively, by a nonprofit or other private provider on 19    behalf of the local public entity and the Attorney 20    General. If a local public entity establishes and operates 21    an instructional program, then all courts operating within 22    the jurisdiction of that local public entity shall order a 23    person convicted of an eligible offense under subsection 24    (a) to attend that local public entity's program. A court 25    shall not be required to order a person to attend that 26    program until the first day of the month next following   HB5455- 3 -LRB104 18216 RLC 31655 b1    the date on which the Attorney General notifies the 2    Administrative Office of the Illinois Courts that the 3    program has been established and approved by the Attorney 4    General; and5        (B) the program shall be established within 6 months 6    of the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th 7    General Assembly. Any court in a jurisdiction that does 8    not have an approved local public entity instructional 9    program as established under subparagraph (A) of this 10    paragraph shall order a person charged with an eligible 11    offense under subsection (a) to attend the approved State 12    program established under this subparagraph, unless there 13    is an extra-jurisdictional local public entity 14    instructional program within 25 miles of the court, and 15    the court has been notified in accordance with this 16    subparagraph, or subparagraph (A) of this paragraph, of 17    the availability of that program to accept participants 18    from the court, in which case the court may instead order a 19    person to attend the local public entity's instructional 20    program; regarding any program notice under this 21    subparagraph, a court shall not be required to order a 22    person to attend a program until the first day of the month 23    next following the date on which the Attorney General 24    notifies the Administrative Office of the Illinois Courts 25    that the program has been established and approved by the 26    Attorney General.  HB5455- 4 -LRB104 18216 RLC 31655 b1    (2) The program shall include information intended to 2increase the person's awareness of:3        (A) the causes of prostitution and its relationship to 4    human trafficking;5        (B) the health and safety risks connected with 6    prostitution, including its impact on the community;7        (C) the consequences of convictions for prostitution 8    or human trafficking, including penalties for subsequent 9    convictions on both patronizers and victims; and10        (D) the pervasiveness of human trafficking as well as 11    the long-term physical and psychological harms of 12    prostitution and human trafficking on its victims.